Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1410.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Commonwealth Party Procurement Contract Terms Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commonwealth party." The government of the Commonwealth, including any of its courts and other officers or agencies of the unified judicial system, the General Assembly and its officers and agencies, the Governor and a department, board, commission, authority, officer and agency of the Commonwealth. The term does not include a political subdivision or municipal or other local authority, or any of their officers or agencies.123456789101112131415161718 "Construction." As defined in 62 Pa.C.S. § 103 (relating to definitions)."Local agency." A government unit other than the Commonwealth government. The term includes an intermediate unit, municipality cooperating in the exercise or performance of governmental functions, powers or responsibilities under 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 23 Subch. A (relating to intergovernmental cooperation), a council of government and other entity created by two or more municipalities under 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 23 Subch. A."Procurement." As defined in 62 Pa.C.S. § 103."Services." As defined in 62 Pa.C.S. § 103."Supplies." As defined in 62 Pa.C.S. § 103.Section 3. Prohibited terms.Except as otherwise required by Federal or State law, a contract or agreement, regardless of cost, for the procurement or disposal of supplies, services or construction or the licensing, access, exchange or use of information, software or information technology entered into by a Commonwealth party or local agency may not include a provision that:(1) Requires the Commonwealth party or local agency to indemnify, defend or hold any other entity harmless from liability.(2) Subjects the Commonwealth party or local agency to binding arbitration or any other binding dispute resolution process.(3) Designates a venue for a legal action or dispute against the Commonwealth party outside the courts of the Commonwealth or a Federal court in Pennsylvania or waives a claim or defense that the forum is not convenient or proper.(4) Requires the contract to be governed by the laws of 20260SB1410PN1864 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a jurisdiction other than the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania or required by Federal law.(5) Conflicts with an applicable Federal or State statute or regulation.(6) Requires the Commonwealth party or local agency to be responsible for or pay attorney or collection fees.(7) Requires the Commonwealth party to pay interest or late fees other than what the Commonwealth party is authorized to pay under section 1507 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, and accompanying regulations under 4 Pa. Code Ch. 2 Subch. B (relating to interest penalties for late payments).Section 4. Effect of prohibited terms.A term or condition in a contract or agreement, regardless of cost, for the procurement or disposal of supplies, services or construction or the licensing, access or use of software or information technology entered into by a Commonwealth party or local agency that violates section 3 shall be void and unenforceable. The remainder of the contract or agreement shall remain valid and enforceable as if the void term had not been included.Section 5. Applicability.This act shall apply to contracts and agreements entered into, amended or renewed, on or after the effective date of this section.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1410PN1864 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627